Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 123, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 123. A. Special judges may hear and decide the
following:
1. Actions for the recovery of money where the amount claimed
does not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and counterclaim
or setoff does not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00);
2. All uncontested matters, whether by default, agreement, or
otherwise, except that a nonlawyer special judge may not hear any
uncontested matters, whether by default, agreement, or otherwise, in
actions for the recovery of money where judgment is sought for a
greater sum than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);
3. Actions for forcible entry and detainer except a nonlawyer
special judge may not hear such actions if title to land or a
boundary dispute is involved;

4. Actions for replevin where the amount in controversy does
not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), except that nonlawyer
special judges may not hear such actions where the amount in
controversy exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);
5. Misdemeanors, except that special judges who are not lawyers
may not hear criminal actions where the punishment prescribed by law
exceeds a fine of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or imprisonment in
a county jail for thirty (30) days, or both such fine and
imprisonment except by written consent of all parties;
6. Felonies involving a second and subsequent offense of
driving, operating, or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or any other
intoxicating substance, including any controlled dangerous substance
as defined in the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, to a
degree that renders the defendant incapable of safely driving or
operating a motor vehicle, except that nonlawyer special judges may
not hear such matters;
7. When there is no district or associate district judge
present in the county or when they are disqualified, the issuance of
a temporary injunction or restraining order, but this paragraph
shall not embrace nonlawyer special judges;
8. Issuance of writs of habeas corpus, but this paragraph shall
not embrace nonlawyer special judges;
9. Any matter, regardless of value, at any stage, whether
intermediate or final, and whether or not title to property, real,
personal, tangible, intangible, or any combination thereof, is to be
determined, in a probate, divorce, domestic relations, custody,
support, guardianship, conservatorship, mental health, juvenile,
adoption, or determination of death proceeding, except that
nonlawyer special judges may not hear such matters;
10. An appeal from an order of the Department of Public Safety
revoking a person's license to drive, except that nonlawyer special
judges may not hear such matters;
11. Other actions and proceedings, regardless of court rules,
where the parties agree in writing, at any time before trial, to the
action being heard by a special judge;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3499 Page 2

12. Any postjudgment collection matter regardless of the amount
of the judgment; and
13. Youthful offender cases pursuant to the Youthful Offender
Act; and
14. Applications for court orders to issue titles including,
but not limited to, applications seeking an order directing the
issuance, reissuance, correction, or replacement of certificates of
title for motor vehicles, manufactured homes, vessels, or other
titled property, and to enter such orders as may be necessary and
proper to effectuate the issuance of title.
B. Special judges shall be authorized to serve as referee in
any matter before the district court.
C. A special judge may perform the duties of a magistrate in
criminal cases.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3499 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3499 Page 4